Colorado, session 2025B, HB25B-1019.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) As the state faces growing fiscal pressure, the general
assembly has a responsibility to adequately fund essential services and
programs that have a measurable value to taxpayers in Colorado;
(b) Currently, for state fiscal year 2025-2026, the office of state
planning and budgeting is projecting a state budget deficit of $783
million;
-2- HB25B-1019

(c) House Bill 25-1321 appropriated $4 million from the
"Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act" cash fund, which resulted in that
money being unavailable for other uses, even though this cash fund had
previously been used as non-federal matching money that enabled the
state and local governments to qualify for federal infrastructure funding
throughout Colorado;
(d) The $4 million House Bill 25-1321 appropriation was made
directly to the office of the governor to pursue legal action against the
federal government if federal grants, contracts, or money are adjusted;
(e) The timing of the enactment of House Bill 25-1321 reflects a
hostile reaction to recent decisions made by the Trump administration as
Colorado continues to fail to adhere to federal requirements, and these
actions have a direct impact on the state's federal funding and
demonstrate a clear disregard for the responsibility of the general
assembly to comply with a federal administration that was fairly elected;
(f) The House Bill 25-1321 appropriation represents a clearly
inefficient use of taxpayer dollars at a time when the state is facing a
structural budget deficit that disproportionately impacts rural
communities and amplifies the financial obstacles that our vulnerable
communities already face;
(g) During the 2025 regular legislative session, house and senate
Republicans proposed a number of amendments to House Bill 25-1321
to represent the will of the people and demonstrate how this funding
could and should be used to benefit the taxpayers of Colorado;
(h) After hours of debate in both chambers, the Democratic
majority rejected all of the Republican minority's proposed changes,
concerns, and pleas to listen to the taxpayers of Colorado and enacted
-3- HB25B-1019

House Bill 25-1321 as a bill that undermines the federal government's
authority and completely disregards the voice of taxpayers in Colorado;
and
(i) Therefore, to appropriately spend the taxpayers' dollars, it is
necessary, appropriate, and in the best interest of all Coloradans to repeal
the law enacted by House Bill 25-1321, including the appropriation of $4
million to the office of the governor, and require the $4 million to be
transferred to the general fund.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-75-232, amend
(8); repeal (4)(d) and (5)(e); and add (4)(a.5) as follows:
24-75-232. "Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act" cash
fund - creation - allowable uses - report - compliance monitoring -
legislative declaration - definitions - repeal. (4) (a.5) NO LATER THAN
THREE DAYS FOLLOWING THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION
(4)(a.5), THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER FOUR MILLION DOLLARS
FROM THE FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(d) The office may seek, accept, and expend gifts, grants, or
donations from private or public sources for the purposes of subsection
(5)(e) of this section. The office shall transmit all money received through
gifts, grants, or donations to the state treasurer, who shall credit the
money to the fund for use for the purposes of subsection (5)(e) of this
section.
(5) (e) In addition to the uses set forth in subsections (5)(a) and
(5)(b) of this section, and notwithstanding subsection (1)(e) of this
section, the office may expend the money in the fund at the governor's
discretion for the following purposes:
(I) Hiring and employing personnel or retaining contractors for
-4- HB25B-1019

purposes related to federal government actions that impact federal
disbursements, grants, contracts, or money received by or transferred to
the state;
(II) Reimbursing the department of law for costs associated with
special assistant attorneys general, pursuant to sections 24-31-101 and
24-31-111 (5), contracted with for the purposes of:
(A) Providing legal services to state officers or employees related
to legal proceedings, inquiries, hearings, or investigations initiated,
pursued, or threatened by the federal government, including congressional
inquiries and investigations; or
(B) Providing legal services for the criminal defense of state
officers or employees in legal actions arising out of official acts or
decisions; or
(III) Other expenditures consistent with the purposes of this
section, as determined by the governor, including expenditures to
preserve and protect state sovereignty or federal funding streams that
benefit the state.
(8) This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2028. Any
unexpended and unencumbered money remaining in the fund upon the
repeal of this section reverts to the general fund.
SECTION 3. In Session Laws of Colorado 2025, repeal section
2 of chapter 206 as follows:
Section 2. Appropriation. For the 2025-26 state fiscal year,
$4,000,000 is appropriated to the office of the governor. This
appropriation is from the "Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act" cash
fund created in section 24-75-232 (3), C.R.S. To implement this act, the
office may use this appropriation for administration of governor's office
-5- HB25B-1019

and residence. Any money appropriated in this section not expended prior
to July 1, 2026, is further appropriated to the office for the 2026-27 state
fiscal year for the same purpose.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-6- HB25B-1019